dictsource/en_rules
.group o
            o            0
         _) o            0
         X) o            0#
         X) o ($w_alt3+++ %0#
         _) o'(P2        %oU     // prefix
            o'er         o@
            o (Ba_       'oU
         _) o (Bal       oU
        XC) o (Bal       oU
         X) o (By_       oU
         _) o (Cy+       0
            o (Be#       oU
            oi (ce#      OI
            o (BeCo_     0
            o (BenC      oU
            o (Beon      'oU
            o (BiA       'oU
            o (Bing      oU
        XC) o (Bus_      oU
            o (Cagh_     oU
            o (Cemic     0
            o (Cet_      0
            o (Ci_       'oU
            o (Cic_      '0
            o (Cical     '0
            o (Co_       'oU
            o (Coist     'oU
            o (_         oU
        ig) o (_         oU
       @@C) o (_         =oU
            oa           oU
            oa (_        'oU@
        br) oa (d        O:
            oar          o@
            oar (_       o@
        cr) o (at        oU
         X) o (ba        oU
         t) o (bacc      @
            o (bed       oU
        _r) o (ber       0
         _) o (bes       %oU
            o (bic_      'oU
         n) o (bil       oU
        _m) o (bil       oU
            o (bje       %0
         _) o (bl        %0#
         n) o (bl        oU
            o (bliga     0
            o (bligato   %0#
            o (blo       0
        _r) o (bo        oU
         _) o (bs        %0
?3       _) o (bs        %0#
         _) obs (er      %0bz
            obso (l      0bs@
            o (bstin     0
         _) o (bt        %0
?3       _) o (bt        %0#
            o (by_       oU
         f) o (cA        oU
        _l) o (cA        oU
        _v) o (cA        oU
        ff) o (cA        @
         l) o (cat       %oU
         _) o (ccasi     @
         _) o (cclu      @
            ocean        oUS@n
         X) o (ct        0
            occur        @k3:
?5          occur        @kVR
            occurr       @k3:
?5          occurr       @kVR
        tr) och          oUk
         d) o (cil       oU
       &%C) ock (_       @k
         l) o (com       ,oU
            ocrates (_   '0kra#ti:z
            o (cre_      'oU
        _h) o (cu        oU
        cr) o (cu        oU
            o (cyte_     =@
         _) o (dA        oU
        _b) o (dy        0
      cust) o (d         @
         k) o (dA        oU
      meth) o (d_        @
      peri) o (d_        @
         d) o (dec       %oU
         m) o (del       0
         m) o (der       0
         m) o (dest      0
      cust) o (di        'oU
            odor         oUd3
        mm) o (dor       @
            odo (rA      oUd@
            odour        oUd3
        &)  o (dy_       @
        b) o  (dy_       0
            oe           oU
        sh) oe (+        u:
            oea (_       'i@
         _) oe (d        i:
         p) oe (m        oUI
            oer          oU3
         _) oe (s        i:
         &) oe (s_S2     z
            oesopha      I2s0f@
         d) oer (_       u:3
         p) oe (t        oUI
         f) oe (tA       i:
         p) oe (ti       oUE
            oe (ve       ,oU'E
?3       &) o (ff        O
?3       _) o (ff        O
?3       c) o (ff        O
            of (fen      @
            o (ffic      0
            o (ffici     @
?3          o (ft        O
            o (gan_      oU
        @l) oge (_       0g
         &) o (gen_      @
            ogeni (c     oUdZ'EnI
            o (genous    '0
            o (geny      '0
         r) o (ger       0
         l) ogism        =@dZIz@m
         @) ographer     '0gr@f3
         _) og (re       oUg
         r) ogue         oUg
         v) ogue         oUg
        @@) ogue         0g
        @l) og (y        =@dZ
            og (etic     @dZ
            oh           oU
            o (hA        oU
         j) oh (n        0
            oi           OI
            oi(na_       'OI
            oia          OI@
            oi (c        oUI2
            oi (ce       OI
            oi (ck       OI
            oi (zA       oUaI
         c) o (inci      %oU
            o (ing       oU
         d) o (ing       u:
            oir          wA@
            oire         wA@
         @) ois (_       wA:
        rt) oise         @s
       orp) oise         @s
            o (ism       oU
         @) o (ist       oU
            oix (_       wa
        tr) o (jan       oU
            o (ky_       oU
         @) ometer       '0mIt3
?3       g) o (ng        O
?3       r) o (ng        O
?3       s) o (ng        O
         t) o (ngu       V
      appr) o (p         oU
      bish) o (p         @
         &) o (p_        @
         p) o (p_        0
         r) o (p_        0
         t) o (p_        0
        fl) o (p_        0
         h) o (p_        0
        pr) o (pe        0
         &) oped (_      @pd
         &) oping (_     @pIN
         c) oped (_      oUpd
         c) oping (_     oUpIN
         _) ope (n       oUp@
        un) ope (n       oUp@
         _) o (per       0
        rc) opha (g      '0f@
         &) ophe (_      =@f%I
         X) o (pher      oU
         &) o (pher      =@
         s) o (phistic   @
            o (pini      @
         @) opol (L02    '0p@l
            opolitan     @p'0lIt@n
            oppor (tu    %0p3
            opp (res     @p
         &) op (y_       @p
            o (que_      oU
            o (shA_      oU
        _C) o (ti        oU
            o (tion      oU
         m) o (x         @
            o (x++       0
            ox (ide      '0ks
            oxy          0ksI
         _) oxy (@@      ,0ksI2
         _) oxy (g       0ksI
            oy           OI
            oy (A_       'OI
         d) o (zen       V
         _) o (zo        oU


.group ol
       &st) ol (_        @L
         _) ol (aX       oUl
            ol (and_     oUl
            ol (ar       oUl
        @@) ol (ar       'oUl
         h) ol (ar       0l
         m) ole (st      @lE
         c) olor         Vl3
         c) ol (our      Vl
        @@) ol (us       'oUl
     contr) ol           oUl
       ext) ol           oUl
       _id) ol           @L
       _id) ol (a        0l
      petr) ol (_        @L
         s) ol (em       0l
         &) ol (i_       0l
         s) ol (ic       @l
         s) ol (il       @l
         t) ol (er       0l
         m) ol (ec       @l
         m) ol (ecule    0l
         &) ol (enC      @l
            old          oUld
         w) olf          Ulf
         p) olice        @li:s
        &p) olis         =@lIs
         p) ol (ite      @l
         s) ol (idi      @l
         f) ol (k        oU
         y) ol (k        oU
         n) oll          oUl
         p) oll (u       @l
         r) oll          oUl
        tr) oll (A       0l
       car) oll          @l
        br) oll          0l
         t) oll          oUl
        at) oll          0l
         w) oll          oUl
            olm (_       oUm
         @) ol (o_       0l
            olo (gi      '0l@
            olo (gic     @l'0
         &) ol (ous_     @l
        _b) ol (st       oUl
            olt          oUlt
         v) olt          oUlt
         v) ol (C        0l
         w) olv          Ulv
       N_p) oly          ,0lI
         _) ol (ym       @l

.group om
         &) om (_        @m
         c) om (_        0m
         c) om (pan      Vm
         r) om (_        0m
         n) om (ad       oUm
         t) oma (to      @mA:
         c) omb (_       oUm
         t) omb (K       u:m
         w) omb (_       u:m
         c) ombe (_      u:m
       _tr) ombo (n      %0mboU
         c) om (e        Vm
         c) omm (e       Vm
        _d) om (a        @m
         d) om (est      @m
         d) om (ini      @m
      @@in) ome (_       'oUmeI
            ome (ter     '0mI
         @) ome (tre     '0mI
         @) ome (try     '0m@
         &) omer (_      @m3
         c) omer (_      Vm3
        gl) om (er       0m
        _p) om (e        0m
        _s) ome          Vm
         s) om (e_       Vm
         s) ome (th      'Vm
        st) omach        Vm@k
         r) om (an       oUm
         r) oman (ti     oUm'an
       chr) om           oUm
       chr) ome          oUm
         w) oma (n       Um@
         w) ome (n       ImI
         _) om (iC       %oUm
            omin (o      '0mIn
         &) om (ise_     =@m
         &) om (ize_     =@m
         @) om (ist_     =@m
         _) omni (@      0mn'I
         &) omy (_       =@m%I

.group on
        @@) on (_        @n
         @) on (_$w_alt2 @n
?8       @) on (_++      0n
        %C) on (_        @n
        &b) on (_        @n
        &c) on (_        @n
        Cd) on (_        @n
?3      ag) on (_        0n
        rg) on (_        @n
        &k) on (_        @n
        &s) on (_        @n
        &t) on (_        @n
       &tr) on (_        0n
        fl) on (_        0n
        il) on (_        0n
        yl) on (_        0n
        &m) on (_        @n
         p) on (_+       0n
        ar) on (_        @n
        dr) on (_        @n
        or) on (_        0n
        cr) on (_        0n
        @x) on (_        @n
      phot) on           @n
      pers) on           @n
      pers) on (i        '0n
     postp) on           'oUn
       _sp) on           0n
        &s) on (an       @n
            on (ald      0n
         &) on (age_     @n
         d) on (at       %oUn
            on (an_      oUn
         _) on (io       Vn
        ec) on (d        @n
         m) on (d_       @n
        &C) oned (_S2v   d
        &C) oning (_S3v  I2N
         _) one          w0n
         _) once (_      w0ns
?6       _) one          wVn
?6       _) once (_      wVns
         g) on (e        0n
         &) on (er_      @n
        ph) on (eti      @n
        _h) on (ey       Vn
         n) on (e        0n
         m) one (ta      VnI
         m) one (ti      0nI2
         _) one (r       oUn@
         m) on (ey       Vn
       und) one (_       Vn
?!3      m) ong (er      VNg
            on (i_       'oUn
         &) onism (_     =@nIz@m
         &) onist (_     =@nIst
         @) on (ica      '0n
         m) on (k        Vn
        _p) on (y        oUn
       _sp) on (g        Vn
        fr) on (t        Vn
         m) on (th       Vn
         &) onous        @n@s
            onus         oUn@s
         w) on           Vn
         w) on (k        0n
         w) on (t        0n
         &) ony (_       @n%I
            onymous      '0nIm@s

.group oo
            oo           u:
         h) oo (d        U
         h) oo (k        U
         w) oo (d        U
         h) oo (d        U
        bl) oo (d        V
        fl) oo (d        V
        st) oo (d        U
         g) oo (d        U
         C) oo (k        U
         k) oo (k        u:
         p) oo (k        u:
         &) oo (n        'u:
         m) oo (n_       u:
        sp) oo (n_       u:
         f) oo (t        U
         s) oo (t        U
         s) oo (th       u:
         w) oo (l        U
        _c) oo (p        oU'0
            oor          o@
        _)  oo (r        u:
            oor (_       o@
        _m) oor          U@
         p) oor          U@
         c) oor (d       oU'O@
            oos (e       u:s
        ch) oose         u:z
        ch) oos (en      oUz
         g) oose         u:s
            oot (ic_     u:'0t
